dev/pronoun/pronoun.bn.dix
<dictionary>
  <pardefs>
    <pardef n="enclitic">
      <!-- passthrough -->
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <!-- ই -->
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ই</l>
          <r><j/>ই<s n="adv"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <!-- ও -->
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ও</l>
          <r><j/>ও<s n="adv"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="কী__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="int"/><s n="nn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="পরস্পর__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="rec"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="যা/রা__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>দের</l>
          <r>রা<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="infml"/><s n="rel"/><s n="aa"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>দেরকে</l>
          <r>রা<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="infml"/><s n="rel"/><s n="aa"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>দের</l>
          <r>রা<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="infml"/><s n="rel"/><s n="aa"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="যেটা__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="rel"/><s n="nn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="কিসের__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="int"/><s n="nn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="নিজে/রা__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>রা</l>
          <r>রা<s n="prn"/><s n="ref"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>দেরকে</l>
          <r>রা<s n="prn"/><s n="ref"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>দের</l>
          <r>রা<s n="prn"/><s n="ref"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="আপনা আপনি__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="rec"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="অন্য/রা__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>দের</l>
          <r>রা<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>রা</l>
          <r>রা<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="সকল__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ের</l>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>কে</l>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="অপর__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>দের</l>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>গুলো</l>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="an"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="an"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/><s n="obj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="অন্যটা__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>র</l>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>য়</l>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>কে</l>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ক/ি__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ার</l>
          <r>ি<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="int"/><s n="aa"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>িসে</l>
          <r>ি<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="int"/><s n="nn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="কিছুটা__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="an"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="অনেকে__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="কেউ__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="aa"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="কা/রা__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>দের</l>
          <r>রা<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="int"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>রা</l>
          <r>রা<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="int"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="কিছু__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="সব__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ার</l>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="সবাই__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>কে</l>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="অন্যটা"><i>অন্যটা</i><par n="অন্যটা__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="অপর"><i>অপর</i><par n="অপর__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="কিসের"><i>কিসের</i><par n="কিসের__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="অনেকে"><i>অনেকে</i><par n="অনেকে__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="নিজে নিজে"><i>নিজে<b/>নিজে</i><par n="আপনা আপনি__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="কি"><i>ক</i><par n="ক/ি__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="কারা"><i>কা</i><par n="কা/রা__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="কেউ"><i>কেউ</i><par n="কেউ__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="যেটা"><i>যেটা</i><par n="যেটা__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="সকল"><i>সকল</i><par n="সকল__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="কিছুটা"><i>কিছুটা</i><par n="কিছুটা__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="সবাই"><i>সবাই</i><par n="সবাই__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="অনেকেই"><i>অনেকেই</i><par n="অনেকে__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="পরস্পর"><i>পরস্পর</i><par n="পরস্পর__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="নিজেরা"><i>নিজে</i><par n="নিজে/রা__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="কিছু"><i>কিছু</i><par n="কিছু__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="আপনা আপনি"><i>আপনা<b/>আপনি</i><par n="আপনা আপনি__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="সব"><i>সব</i><par n="সব__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="অন্যরা"><i>অন্য</i><par n="অন্য/রা__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="কী"><i>কী</i><par n="কী__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="যারা"><i>যা</i><par n="যা/রা__prn"/></e>
